apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="l/ægge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>æg</l>        <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægge</l>      <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægger</l>     <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ægges</l>     <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>      <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æggende</l>   <r>ægge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/idde__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idde</l>      <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idder</l>     <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddes</l>     <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddet</l>     <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iddende</l>   <r>idde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/ade__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ade</l>       <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ader</l>      <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ades</l>      <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>        <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adet</l>      <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adende</l>    <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="syn/es__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esnde</l>     <r>es<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/ølge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ølg</l>       <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølge</l>      <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølger</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølges</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgte</l>     <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ulgt</l>      <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ølgende</l>   <r>ølge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sp/ørge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ørg</l>       <r>ørge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørge</l>      <r>ørge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørger</l>     <r>ørge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørges</l>     <r>ørge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urgte</l>     <r>ørge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urgt</l>      <r>ørge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ørgende</l>   <r>ørge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fald/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="v/ælge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ælg</l>       <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælge</l>      <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælger</l>     <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælges</l>     <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>algte</l>     <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>algt</l>      <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælgende</l>   <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bet/yde__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>yd</l>        <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yde</l>       <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yder</l>      <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ød</l>        <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydet</l>      <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydende</l>    <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tr/ække__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>æk</l>        <r>ække<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ække</l>      <r>ække<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ækker</l>     <r>ække<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ækkes</l>     <r>ække<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>        <r>ække<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ække<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ækkende</l>   <r>ække<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="g/ælde__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>æld</l>       <r>ælde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælde</l>      <r>ælde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælder</l>     <r>ælde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ældes</l>     <r>ælde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aldt</l>      <r>ælde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jaldt</l>     <r>ælde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ældt</l>      <r>ælde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ældende</l>   <r>ælde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/ælge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ælg</l>       <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælge</l>      <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælger</l>     <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælges</l>     <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olgte</l>     <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olgt</l>      <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ælgende</l>   <r>ælge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="knække">          <i>kn</i><par n="tr/ække__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beslaglægge">     <i>beslagl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="betyde">          <i>bet</i><par n="bet/yde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="efterspørge">     <i>eftersp</i><par n="sp/ørge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="følge">           <i>f</i><par n="f/ølge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="falde">           <i>fald</i><par n="fald/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gælde">           <i>g</i><par n="g/ælde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lægge">           <i>l</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lade">            <i>l</i><par n="l/ade__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="længes">          <i>læng</i><par n="syn/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="løsnes">          <i>løsn</i><par n="syn/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="planlægge">       <i>planl</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sidde">           <i>s</i><par n="s/idde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sælge">           <i>s</i><par n="s/ælge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skændes">         <i>skænd</i><par n="syn/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spørge">          <i>sp</i><par n="sp/ørge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="synes">           <i>syn</i><par n="syn/es__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trække">          <i>tr</i><par n="tr/ække__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vælge">           <i>v</i><par n="v/ælge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ødelægge">        <i>ødel</i><par n="l/ægge__vblex"/></e>
